Illinois, session 104th, HB3030.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Removal of Unlawful Publications of Obscene and Harmful 6Depictions On Social Media Platforms Act. 7    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Depiction by computer" means a computer program or data 9that, after being processed by a computer either alone or in 10conjunction with one or more computer programs, results in a 11visual depiction on a computer monitor, screen, or display.12    "Harm" means physical harm, economic harm, reputational 13injury, or emotional distress whether or not accompanied by 14physical or economic harm.15    "Obscene depiction" means a visual representation of any 16kind, including an image, video, or computer-generated image 17or video, whether made, produced, or altered by electronic, 18mechanical, or other means, that:19        (1) the average person, applying contemporary adult 20    community standards, would find that, taken as a whole, 21    appeals to the prurient interest; and22        (2) taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, 23    artistic, political, or scientific value.  HB3030- 2 -LRB104 09701 RLC 19767 b1    "Social media platform" means a public or semi-public 2Internet-based service or application that has users in 3Illinois and that meets both of the following criteria:4        (1) A substantial function of the service or 5    application is to connect users in order to allow users to 6    interact socially with each other within the service or 7    application. A service or application that provides email 8    or direct messaging services shall not be considered to 9    meet this criterion on the basis of that function alone.10        (2) The service or application allows users to do all 11    of the following:12            (A) construct a public or semi-public profile for 13        purposes of signing into and using the service or 14        application;15            (B) populate a list of other users with whom an 16        individual shares a social connection within the 17        system; and18            (C) create or post content viewable or audible by 19        other users, including, but not limited to, live 20        streams, on message boards, in chat rooms, or through 21        a landing page or main feed that presents the user with 22        content generated by other users.  23    Section 10. Requirement of social media platforms to 24promptly remove unlawful publications of obscene images.25    (a) Following a report to a social media platform that an   HB3030- 3 -LRB104 09701 RLC 19767 b1obscene depiction or otherwise harmful depiction by computer, 2has been unlawfully published on the social media platform, 3the subject report must be promptly investigated for 4credibility, and, if deemed credible, the subject image must 5be promptly removed by the operator of the social media 6platform within 24 hours of the submission of the report.7    (b) Upon a finding of credibility by the social media 8platform that a report that an obscene depiction or otherwise 9harmful depiction by computer has been unlawfully published on 10the social media platform, the report, accompanied with any 11and all identifying information of the publisher of the 12unlawfully published obscene depiction or otherwise harmful 13depiction by computer media image, must be reported to the 14Office of the Attorney General. 15    Section 15. Enforcement. Whenever it appears to the 16Attorney General, upon report, complaint or otherwise by a 17social media platform or other person or entity, that any 18person, within or outside the State, has unlawfully published 19an obscene depiction or otherwise harmful depiction by 20computer, on a social media platform, the Attorney General may 21bring an action or proceeding in the name and on behalf of the 22People of the State of Illinois to:23        (1) enjoin any violation of this Act;24        (2) obtain restitution of any moneys or property 25    obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation;  HB3030- 4 -LRB104 09701 RLC 19767 b1        (3) obtain disgorgement of any profits or gains 2    obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation;3        (4) obtain damages caused directly or indirectly by 4    any such violation;5        (5) obtain civil penalties not exceeding $25,000 per 6    violation; and7        (6) obtain any such other and further relief as the 8    court may deem proper, including preliminary relief. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.